Utah statutes.
4-15-8.   Transport of out-of-state nursery stock to Utah -- Certificate of
inspection to be filed with department by out-of-state nurseries -- Option in
department to accept exchange list in lieu of certificate of inspection --
Imported stock to be tagged -- Treatment of stock not tagged.
(1) Out-of-state nurseries and nursery outlets transporting nursery stock to a
nursery or nursery outlet in this state shall annually deliver to the
department a certified duplicate copy of the "state of origin" certificate of
inspection for each such out-of-state nursery or nursery outlet; provided,
that the department may accept and exchange a list of certified or licensed
out-of-state nurseries or nursery outlets in lieu of a certificate of
inspection for each such individual nursery or nursery outlet.
(2)  Nursery stock originating outside and imported into this state for
customer delivery or for resale shall bear a tag stating that the nursery
stock has been inspected and certified free from plant pests and disease. The
tag shall also bear the name and address of the shipper or consignor. A
shipment of nursery stock destined for delivery in this state which is not
accompanied with such a tag may be returned to the owner or consignor at such
person's expense, or may be destroyed, or otherwise disposed of by the
department without compensation to the owner or consignor.
